North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 12O. Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee.

§ 120-70.130.
Creation and membership of Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee.

The Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee is established. The Committee consists of 22 members as follows:

Eleven members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least three of whom are members of the minority party; and

Eleven members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, at least three of whom are members of the minority party.

Terms on the Committee are for two years and begin on the convening of the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year, except the terms of the initial members, which begin on appointment and end on the day of the convening of the 2007 General Assembly. Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee.

A member continues to serve until a successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

2005-241, s. 7; 2011-291, s. 1.10(a); 2011-292, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.10(a), effective June 24, 2011, in the introductory paragraph, substituted “22 members” for “12 members”; and in subdivisions (1) and (2), substituted “Eleven members” for “Six members” and added “at least three of whom are members of the minority party.”

Session Laws 2011-292, s. 1, effective June 24, 2011, in the section catchline and in the introductory paragraph, inserted “and Global Engagement.”

§ 120-70.131.
Purpose and powers of Committee.

The Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee shall examine, on a continuing basis, economic development and global engagement issues and strategies in North Carolina in order to make ongoing recommendations to the General Assembly on ways to promote cost-effective economic development initiatives, economic growth, and stimulating job creation in the global economy. In this examination, the Committee may:

Study the budgets, programs, and policies of the Department of Commerce, the North Carolina Partnership for Economic Development, and other State, regional, and local entities involved in economic development.

Analyze legislation from other states regarding economic development.

Analyze proposals produced by the Economic Development Board.

(3a)

Request the Department of Commerce to provide an annual report by January 15 of each year on the effectiveness of the following economic development programs:

Job Development Investment Grant Program (JDIG).

One North Carolina.

Article 3J Credits.

Job Maintenance and Capital Development Fund (JMAC).

Analyze North Carolina’s current international activity in the business, State government, and education sectors.

Analyze barriers to international trade that may be addressed by legislation.

Explore ways to increase coordination, synchronization, and intercommunication between State and local governmental entities.

Collect and analyze data on global business trends.

Study foreign representation opportunities for North Carolina that could solicit, target, educate, and recruit international businesses to North Carolina.

Analyze incentives designed to encourage small businesses to export goods and service solutions.

Study methods for positioning North Carolina as a portal to North America for international trade.

Explore opportunities to increase foreign direct investment in North Carolina.

Study any other matters that the Committee considers necessary to fulfill its mandate.

The Committee may make interim reports to the General Assembly on matters for which it may report to a regular session of the General Assembly. A report to the General Assembly may contain any legislation needed to implement a recommendation of the Committee.

History.

2005-241, s. 7; 2011-291, s. 1.10(b); 2011-292, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.10(b), effective June 24, 2011, added subdivision (a)(3a).

Session Laws 2011-292, s. 1, effective June 24, 2011, in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a), in the first sentence, inserted “and Global Engagement,” substituted “economic development and global engagement issues” for “economic growth and development issues,” and added “economic growth, and stimulating job creation in the global economy”; added subdivisions (a)(4) through (a)(11); and redesignated former subdivision (a)(4) as present subdivision (a)(12).

§ 120-70.132.
Organization of Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee. The Committee shall meet upon the joint call of the cochairs.

A quorum of the Committee is seven members. Only recommendations, including proposed legislation, receiving at least six affirmative votes may be included in a Committee report to the General Assembly. While in the discharge of its official duties, the Committee has the powers of a joint committee under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

.

The cochairs of the Committee may call upon other knowledgeable persons or experts to assist the Committee in its work.

Members of the Committee shall receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, or 138-6, as appropriate. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Supervisors of Clerks of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee. The expenses for clerical employees shall be borne by the Committee.

History.

2005-241, s. 7; 2011-292, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-292, s. 1, effective June 24, 2011, inserted “and Global Engagement” in subsection (a).